South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S637.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 44-36-330(C) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (C) The advisory council shall maintain and update a statewide plan to address Alzheimer's disease and related dementias. The plan must be updated every five years. Data to develop the statewide plan must be utilized from the Alzheimer's Disease Registry, which must be funded through the annual general appropriations act. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----